Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.070

Attorney's fees to contestant of erroneous account or report.

If, in any probate or guardianship proceeding, any personal representative shall fail or neglect to report to the court concerning his or her trust and any beneficiary or other interested party shall be reasonably required to employ legal counsel to institute legal proceedings to compel an accounting, or if an erroneous account or report shall be rendered by any personal representative and any beneficiary of said trust or other interested party shall be reasonably required to employ legal counsel to resist said account or report as rendered, and upon a hearing an accounting shall be ordered, or the account as rendered shall not be approved, and the said personal representative shall be charged with further liability, the court before which said proceeding is pending may, in its discretion, in addition to statutory costs, enter judgment for reasonable attorney's fees in favor of the person or persons instituting said proceedings and against said personal representative, and in the event that the surety or sureties upon the bond of said personal representative be made a party to said proceeding, then jointly against said surety and said personal representative, which judgment shall be enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as judgments in ordinary civil actions.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2066; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.070. Prior: 1937 c 28 s 2; RRS s 1590-2.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SPR 98.12W.